Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 4
PEST CONTROL

Section

35-4-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Pest Control Act".

Source:

L. 37:

p. 643, § 2.

CSA:

C. 80, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-1.

35-4-101.5. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that there is a need to prevent the introduction into Colorado and the dissemination within this state of plant pests through the movement of plant products and other plant material. This act provides for the regulation of the movement of plant products, materials, and pests in Colorado and establishes provisions under which such plant products and materials may legally enter or leave the state. This act also provides for the establishment of interstate and intrastate quarantines to restrict the movement of plant products, materials, and pests. To this end, the commissioner of agriculture is hereby directed and authorized to control and prevent, by such means as shall be prescribed and provided by law, rule, or order of the commissioner, all contagious, infectious, and plant pests destructive to the state's agricultural, forestry, or horticultural interests or to the state's general environmental quality.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 925, § 1, effective July 1.

35-4-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board of county commissioners" means the public officials duly elected to that public office or their designated agents.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission created in section 35-1-105.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designated agents.

"County pest inspector" means any qualified employee of a board of county commissioners employed under this article 4.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Eradicate" means the complete elimination of a pest and its parts capable of reproduction based on its absence.

"Insect pests" means any of the small invertebrate animals in the phylum arthropoda that are injurious to plants and animals.

"Joint phytosanitary program" means a federal program designed to recognize a state official control program to eradicate or contain a plant pest that is not regulated by the lead federal agency and affords equivalent protection at ports of entry for the same pest if the states where it is destined are under official control.

"Local government" means a county, municipality, city and county, or pest control district.

"Official control" means official actions taken by a plant pest regulatory agency to eradicate or suppress a plant pest with the goal of eliminating isolated plant pest infestations.

"Permit" means a document prepared by the commissioner that authorizes the movement of regulated articles that cannot meet official quarantine requirements to a specified destination for specialized handling, utilization, or processing or for treatment.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not.

"Pests" means organisms that cause harm to agriculture or natural lands.

"Pests" includes insect pests, plant pests, and animal pests, except rodents, jackrabbits, and predatory animals, and includes plant diseases and weeds.

For purposes of section 35-4-107, the definition of pests does not include noxious weeds.

"Plant diseases" means the pathological conditions in plants caused by fungi, bacteria, viruses, nematodes, mycoplasmas, or parasitic seed plants.

"Plant pest" means any living stage of a pest that can, directly or indirectly, cause disease in, spoilage of, or damage to plants, plant parts, or processed plant materials.

"Plant product" means unmanufactured material of plant origin that, by the product's nature, may create a risk for the introduction and spread of pests.

"Public nuisance" means a plant, plant product, conveyance, premises, or regulated article that harbors, is infested or infected with, is liable to spread, or is exposed to a plant pest, communicable or infectious disease, weed, or arthropod that may cause damage or harm to, or whose eradication, treatment, or control may benefit, persons, industries, or communities within the state, regardless of whether it may damage or harm the public generally.

"Quarantine" means the official confinement of regulated articles for, regulated pests for, or organisms for inspection, testing, treatment, observation, or research.

"Regulated article" means any of the following that could harbor pests: An organism, a material, a tangible object, or a substance.

"Regulated nonquarantine pest" means a pest that is:

Present in Colorado; and

Under a mandated control program due to specific local circumstances, notwithstanding that the pest may be widely distributed in the United States.

"Regulated pest" means a quarantine pest or a regulated nonquarantine pest designated by federal or state plant protection officials.

"Weed" means any destructive or troublesome plant when found to be of sufficient economic importance to threaten the public welfare or affect natural resources.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 643, § 1.

CSA:

C. 80, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-2.

L. 56:

p. 99, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-2.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 455, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 85:

(3.5) and (9) added, (6) amended, and (8) repealed, pp. 1130, 1135, §§ 1, 15, effective May 16.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 911, § 4, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For control of rodents, jackrabbits, and predatory animals, see article 7 of this title 35.

35-4-103. Administration.

The commissioner shall administer this article. A board of county commissioners shall concurrently administer this article and shall have full authority for the proper enforcement thereof by county pest inspectors employed by said board of county commissioners.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule made, order issued, or quarantine declared pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require any person to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule made, order issued, or quarantine declared pursuant to this article. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease immediately.

At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request a prompt hearing to determine whether or not such violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted promptly and shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Whenever the commissioner possesses sufficient evidence satisfactory to the commissioner indicating that a person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or rule, order, or quarantine, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for an order to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule, quarantine, or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of a witness to obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the court order shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 644, § 5.

CSA:

C. 80, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-3.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 456, § 2, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1130, § 2, effective May 16.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 320, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 24, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2007:

(2)(a) and (3) amended, p. 925, § 2, effective July 1.

35-4-104. County pest inspectors.

The persons who may be employed under this article, aside from employees of the department of agriculture, shall be county pest inspectors and their deputies, who shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county where they are to serve and receive their pay. The board of county commissioners of any county when petitioned by not less than fifty landowners of the county shall appoint a county pest inspector at its next regular board meeting.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 644, § 6.

CSA:

C. 80, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-4.

Cross references:

For appointment of county pest inspectors in pest control districts, see § 35-5-106.

35-4-105. Compensation.

A county pest inspector shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the board of county commissioners hiring such county pest inspector. The board of county commissioners shall provide for reimbursement of the county pest inspector for actual expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 644, § 7.

CSA:

C. 80, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-5.

L. 78:

Entire section R&RE, p. 456, § 3, effective April 27.

35-4-106. County pest inspectors - examination of applicants.

It is the duty of a board of county commissioners to examine all applicants for the positions of county pest inspectors, and, if an applicant is found competent and fully qualified to perform the duties of the office, the board shall issue a license as county pest inspector. A person shall not act as county pest inspector without a license. The license is valid for three years.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 645, § 8.

CSA:

C. 80, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-6.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 456, § 4, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 3, effective May 16.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1250), ch. 240, p. 1166, § 1, effective August 7.

35-4-107. Inspections - notice - treatment - collection of costs.

The county pest inspector shall have the right to enter upon any public or private property during reasonable business hours to inspect for pest infestations or infection and ensure compliance with the requirements of this article and any local requirements when at least one of the following has occurred:

The landowner or occupant has requested an inspection;

A neighboring landowner or occupant has reported a suspected pest infestation or infection and requested an inspection; or

An authorized agent of the county in which the property is situated has made a visual observation from a public right-of-way or area and has reason to believe that a pest infestation or infection exists.

No entry upon any property shall be permitted until the landowner or occupant has been sent a notification by certified mail to the landowner's or occupant's last-known address that such entry is pending. When possible, inspections shall be scheduled and conducted with the concurrence of the landowner or occupant.

If, after receiving notice that an inspection is pending, the landowner or occupant denies access to the county pest inspector, the board of county commissioners may seek an inspection warrant issued by a municipal, county, or district court having jurisdiction over the land. The court shall issue an inspection warrant upon presentation by the board of county commissioners, through its agent or employee, of an affidavit that provides a specific description of the location of the affected land and sets forth information that gives the county pest inspector probable cause to believe that a provision of this article is being or has been violated and the landowner or occupant has denied access to the county pest inspector. No landowner or occupant shall deny access to such land when presented with an inspection warrant.

The county pest inspector shall have the authority to notify and advise the landowner or occupant in writing by certified mail of the findings of the inspection. If such findings indicate a pest infestation or infection, such notice shall name the pest, advise the landowner or occupant to manage the pest, and specify the available control methods of integrated pest management, including mechanical, chemical, and biological methods. Such notice shall inform the landowner or occupant that the state forester or county extension office may be consulted concerning integrated pest management. Where possible, the county pest inspector shall consult with such landowner or occupant in the development of a plan for the management of pest infestations and infections on the premises or lands.

Within ten days after receipt of notification of a pest infestation or infection, the landowner or occupant:

Shall comply with the terms of the notification;

Shall acknowledge the terms of the notification and submit an acceptable plan and schedule for the completion of a plan for compliance; or

May request a hearing before the board of county commissioners or a panel appointed by the board if the landowner or occupant disputes the finding of infestation or infection by the county pest inspector. Any owner requesting a hearing need not control the pests pending the outcome of the hearing. The board of county commissioners conducting the hearing shall order appropriate relief if it finds there is infestation or infection as alleged in the written notice. The owner shall pay for any relief, not to exceed ten thousand dollars annually, ordered under this article, including up to twenty percent of the cost of pest control measures for inspection and other incidental costs.

When necessary to enforce the provisions of this article, a county pest inspector, after notice of pest infestation or infection to the owner pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, shall treat to control the pests on plant host material, buildings, or other property. Such treatment shall not be commenced by a county pest inspector pending the outcome of any hearing requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Upon the completion of such work, a statement of the cost and expense thereof along with a description of the property upon which such work was done shall be filed with the board of county commissioners, who shall pay same without unnecessary delay.

Upon payment by the board of county commissioners of any cost and expense of treating pest infestation or infection in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, the county shall demand in writing from the owner, in person or by mail addressed to the owner at his or her last-known place of residence, reimbursement to the county for the amount of the county's direct costs and expenses only. The county shall not send a written demand for more than ten thousand dollars. In the written notice, the county shall inform the owner of the right to appear before the board of county commissioners at any meeting thereof, as fixed by law, to be held within the following four months, and be heard as to the amount of the claim for reimbursement. If the claim, as originally demanded by the board or as adjusted upon a hearing, is not paid at the end of the four-month period, the board shall certify the claim to the county treasurer of the county where the property is located. The county treasurer shall add the amount of the claim to any taxes due, or to become due, from the owner, and if the claim is not paid in due course, the county treasurer shall file a lien on the property. The lien's priority is based upon the date of recording in accordance with article 35 of title 38, C.R.S. The board of county commissioners shall work with any landowner to develop a payment schedule for the cost of an assessment for pest treatment upon a demonstration by the landowner of an economic hardship. All accounts when collected must be deposited into the general fund of the county.

If the board of county commissioners finds that a pest infestation or infection is a result of or can be attributed to an infestation or infection on land owned by any federal, state, or local governmental unit that has not been treated or is not under control, the landowner shall not be charged for any relief ordered pursuant to this section.

A county shall not provide for or compel the management of pests on private property under this section without first applying the same or greater management measures to any land or rights-of-way owned or administered by the local governing body that are adjacent to the private property.

A county pest inspector or agent thereof does not have a cause of action against a landowner or occupant for personal injury or property damage incurred while on public or private land while working within the course and scope of the inspector's duties except when such damages were willfully caused by the landowner.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 645, § 9.

CSA:

C. 80, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-7.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 457, § 5, effective April 27.

L. 85:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1131, § 4, effective May 16.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 281, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2013:

(1)(e)(III) and (3) amended and (5) and (6) added, (HB 13-1250), ch. 240, p. 1166, § 2, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For spraying land adjacent to highways infested with insects or on which weed destruction is desired, see § 43-2-207; for the "Pesticide Applicators' Act", see article 10 of this title 35; for collection of taxes, see article 10 of title 39; for the effect of the "Colorado Agricultural Marketing Act of 1939" on this article 4, see § 35-28-123.

35-4-108. Unlawful to transport pests.

It is unlawful for any person, by any means whatsoever, to knowingly transport, into or in Colorado, live pests or host material which may be injurious to agriculture or horticulture in this state, without permission from the commissioner.

The commissioner may issue and enforce a hold order against any person who owns or controls any nursery stock, agricultural crop, or other plant material that is suspected of harboring a plant pest or disease, for the purpose of isolating the material, restricting its movement, and specifying appropriate sanitary measures pending completion of testing to confirm the presence of such pest or disease.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 647, § 10.

CSA:

C. 80, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-8.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 5, effective May 16.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 926, § 3, effective July 1.

35-4-109. Emergency disposal of plant material.

Any shipment of any plant material into Colorado when found to be in violation of a quarantine declared pursuant to section 35-4-110 or when found to carry exotic pests not previously found in the United States or pests known to cause high levels of economic damage under similar conditions of climate and natural habitat in other areas outside this state by the commissioner may be placed in isolation or quarantine by the commissioner and shall be completely under the commissioner's control. The owner or bailee shall comply with all terms of the quarantine, abate such pests as directed by and to the satisfaction of the commissioner or remove such shipment from the state within such time as ordered by the commissioner. Articles not removed from the state as ordered shall be destroyed by the commissioner with no recompense therefor to the owner. Any owner or bailee claiming that his or her shipment of plant material was destroyed or ordered removed from the state without reasonable justification may request a hearing on that issue before the commissioner within ten days after such destruction or order of removal. If it is determined that a shipment of plant material was destroyed or ordered removed from the state by the commissioner without reasonable justification and that such action was done arbitrarily and capriciously, the department of agriculture shall reimburse such owner or bailee for any losses suffered.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 647, § 11.

CSA:

C. 80, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-9.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 458, § 6, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 6, effective May 16.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 321, § 2, effective April 16.

35-4-110. Quarantine and control of pests - rules.

Whenever the commissioner finds any portion of the state to be affected with exotic pests not previously found in the United States, pests known to cause high levels of economic damage under similar conditions of climate and natural habitat in other areas outside this state, or pests which are known to have caused high levels of economic damage in the past within this state and in the commissioner's judgment plants or plant parts, whether living or dead, domestic animals, or other objects from the district affected would be liable to spread the pests into other sections of the state to the injury of others, the commissioner, after a hearing conducted pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., may declare a quarantine against such section or portion of the state to prevent the transfer of carriers of such pests from the quarantined area.

Whenever it is ascertained that exotic pests not previously found in the United States, pests known to cause high levels of economic damage under similar conditions of climate and natural habitat in other areas outside this state, or pests which are known to have caused high levels of economic damage in the past within this state are likely to be introduced into Colorado by the importation of plants or plant parts, whether living or dead, domestic animals, or other objects, the commissioner, after a hearing conducted pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., may declare a quarantine against the importation into Colorado of such pest carriers.

The commissioner is authorized, pursuant to the provisions of this article, to apply such control or eradication measures as may be necessary to prevent the migration of exotic pests not previously found in the United States, pests known to cause high levels of economic damage under similar conditions of climate and natural habitat in other areas outside the state, or pests known to have caused high levels of economic damage in the past within this state that threaten to become established in this state and that endanger agricultural or horticultural industries in this state. The actual costs to offset the cash funds expended for services performed by the commissioner in imposing the quarantine and such control or eradication measures shall be recovered from the producers of any crop protected by such quarantine pursuant to rules promulgated by the commissioner. If the governor declares an emergency pursuant to section 35-4-110.5, the commissioner's costs may be recovered from the disaster emergency fund, created in section 24-33.5-706, C.R.S. The commissioner is authorized to accept assistance, services, facilities, and grants tendered by federal or local governmental units or other persons.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 647, § 12.

CSA:

C. 80, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-10.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 7, effective May 16.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 321, § 3, effective April 16.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 926, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1697, § 106, effective August 7.

35-4-110.5. Declaration of quarantine emergency.

The commissioner shall notify the governor of the necessity for declaring a quarantine emergency if all of the following conditions are met:

The commissioner has declared a quarantine pursuant to section 35-4-110 (1) or (2) or both.

The commissioner has determined that the pest which is the subject of the quarantine is being or may be spread.

The commissioner has determined that the pest poses a serious threat of economic harm to any segment of the agricultural or horticultural industry of this state.

Upon being so notified by the commissioner, the governor may declare a state of quarantine emergency to be in effect. Such state of emergency shall be in effect for no more than one hundred eighty days and may be renewed for successive periods of no more than one hundred eighty days upon certification by the commissioner to the governor that the threat from the pest continues to exist and continues to justify the emergency enforcement measures.

When the governor declares a quarantine emergency, the governor is authorized to accept assistance, services, facilities, and grants tendered by federal and local governmental units or other persons.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 321, § 4, effective April 16, 1996.)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1134, § 8, effective May 16.

L. 96:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 321, § 4, effective April 16.

35-4-111. Inspections - certificates - remedial measures.

Should any owner or bailee request an inspection of crops, plant material, or other articles or premises for pests, the commissioner shall provide such inspection and issue a certificate setting forth the facts of said inspection and shall charge the owner or bailee adequate fees to cover the cost of such inspections and certificates. The commissioner has authority to impound and prohibit movement, sale, or disposal of such crops, plant material, or other articles until such fees are paid. The release of such crops, plant material, or other articles shall also be dependent on meeting all inspection requirements.

The commissioner may conduct inspections and issue phytosanitary and export certificates on plants for individual shipment to other states or foreign countries if those plants comply with the requirements or regulations of such state or foreign country. The commissioner may collect inspection and certification fees, in an amount established by the agricultural commission, to cover the direct and indirect costs of providing such services. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3. Within sixty days after July 1, 2009, the unexpended and unencumbered balance of the phytosanitary inspection fund, as that fund existed prior to July 1, 2009, shall be transferred to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund.

The commission may enter into compliance agreements with producers and distributors of nursery stock, agricultural crops, and other plant materials for the purpose of certifying such plant materials as pest-free for export certification. At any time after entering into such an agreement, if the commissioner has reason to believe that the producer or distributor of the plant material that is the subject of the agreement has failed to comply with all of the terms of the agreement, the commissioner may terminate the agreement by giving the producer or distributor written notice of such termination and the grounds therefor.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 648, § 13.

CSA:

C. 80, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-11.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 459, § 7, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1134, § 9, effective May 16.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 927, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 315, § 3, effective July 1.

35-4-112. Right of entry.

Except as provided in section 35-4-107, the commissioner and any authorized agent thereof and county pest inspectors employed under this article, together with such help as they may need in the prosecution of their work, are authorized upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant, during reasonable business hours, to enter upon or into any premises, land, buildings, or other places of business for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 649, § 16.

CSA:

C. 80, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-12.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 459, § 8, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1134, § 10, effective May 16.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 322, § 5, effective April 16.

35-4-113. Authority of commissioner to enter into agreements.

The commissioner may enter into agreements with other agencies of this state or of other states or any agency of the federal government and delegate authority to representatives thereof when such agencies or representatives may assist in carrying out the provisions of this article.

The commissioner may enter into agreements with any agency of the federal government for the purposes of inspecting sites and plants and monitoring compliance with post-entry quarantine as required by the federal "Plant Protection Act", 7 U.S.C. sec. 7712 et seq., as amended, and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto. The actual costs to offset the cash funds expended by the commissioner pursuant to such agreement, including, but not limited to, promulgating any rules necessary for the administration and enforcement of such agreement and conducting inspections of sites and plants shall be recovered from the persons who have signed post-entry quarantine growing agreements covering the sites where the articles are grown or, if no such agreement exists, from the owners of the articles at the growing sites.

The commissioner may enter into cooperative agreements with any other state or federal agency for the purpose of conducting inspections and issuing phytosanitary certificates pursuant to section 35-4-111.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 649, § 17.

CSA:

C. 80, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-13.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 459, § 9, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1135, § 11, effective May 16.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 322, § 6, effective April 16.

L. 2007:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 927, § 6, effective July 1.

35-4-113.5. Delegation of duties.

The commissioner, in his discretion, may delegate his authority to an employee to execute the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1135, § 12, effective May 16.

35-4-114. Penalties.

Except for sections 35-4-107 and 35-4-110.5, any person who violates any of the provisions of this article 4 commits a civil infraction. The commissioner or a board of county commissioners may refer such cases to the district attorney of the county in which such violation is alleged to have occurred for such action as may be deemed necessary. The conviction of a violation of any of the provisions of this article 4 shall be cause for revocation of any certificate, permit, or appointment issued under this article 4.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 649, § 18.

CSA:

C. 80, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-14.

L. 78:

Entire section R&RE, p. 460, § 10, effective April 27.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1135, § 13, effective May 16.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3276, § 616, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For certificates issued by the department of agriculture pursuant to this article 4, see § 35-4-111.

35-4-114.5. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule or quarantine declared pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the financial hardship such penalty may cause to the business of the person charged.

Any civil penalty recovered pursuant to this section shall be credited to the general fund.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 322, § 7, effective April 16.

35-4-115. Reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 37:

p. 650, § 19.

CSA:

C. 80, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 6-10-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-10-15.

L. 78:

Entire section repealed, p. 460, § 11, effective April 27.

35-4-116. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as he deems necessary for the administration and enforcement of this article. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1135, § 14, effective May 16.

35-4-117. County pest inspectors - weed and rodent control.

Subject to the direction of the board of county commissioners, a county pest inspector may exercise the powers and duties granted to, and perform the duties of, a county in accordance with articles 5.5 and 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1250), ch. 240, p. 1167, § 3, effective August 7.

35-4-118. Voluntary agreements to provide pest services.

The commissioner may enter into an agreement with any person to or local government to provide pest control services, including eradication or treatment, authorized by this article 4. The department may provide pest control services directly or through a local government and may require remuneration for providing pest control services. The commissioner shall transfer any money received under this section to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the money in the emergency invasive-pest response fund created in section 35-1-106.4.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 913, § 5, effective September 7.

35-4-119. Joint phytosanitary program.

The commissioner may work cooperatively with the United States secretary of agriculture, or the secretary's designee, to implement a joint phytosanitary program if the program would economically or environmentally assist with mitigating or eradicating the spread of a regulated nonquarantine pest.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 913, § 5, effective September 7.

35-4-120. Quarantine of nonregulated pests.

The commissioner may quarantine a regulated article if the regulated article may harbor a regulated pest that has an economically unacceptable impact, as determined by the commissioner, and if the measures to control the pest may achieve an acceptable level of official control.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 913, § 5, effective September 7.

35-4-121. Emergency control and eradication of invasive pests.

If the commissioner determines that a public nuisance creates an unacceptable risk of spreading a pest, the commissioner may coordinate with industry to, support local governments to, and make grants to take emergency action to quarantine, control, or eradicate an invasive pest.

A board of county commissioners may declare a pest to be a public nuisance and require its control or eradication.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1045), ch. 160, p. 914, § 5, effective September 7.